Utah statutes.
51-9-304.   Creation of Severance Tax Holding Account -- Distribution of
funds in the account.
(1) (a)  There is created a restricted account within the General Fund known
as the "Severance Tax Holding Account."
(b)  The Severance Tax Holding Account shall consist of:
(i)  appropriations from the Legislature;
(ii)  grants from private foundations; and
(iii)  all monies credited to the Severance Tax Holding Account under Section
51-9-305.
(2) (a)  The state treasurer shall invest monies in the account according to
Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act.
(b)  The Division of Finance shall deposit interest or other earnings derived
from investment of account monies into the General Fund.
(3)  If authorized by law the Division of Finance shall deposit all of the
monies in the Severance Tax Holding Account as of June 30, 2009, into the
permanent state trust fund.
